South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3863.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Citation SECTION 1.    This act may be cited as the "South Carolina STEM Opportunity Act." Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) Coalition SECTION 2.    Chapter 1, Title 13 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 17 Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) Coalition Section 13-1-2210.    The South Carolina Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) Coalition (Coalition) is established from the existing South Carolina's Coalition for Mathematics & Science (SCCMS) and S2TEM Centers SC. The purpose of the coalition is to build public/private partnerships among state agencies, state-funded entities, not for profits, private businesses, entities, organizations, and industries with the goal of building a technology-ready STEM workforce and ensuring South Carolina students are prepared for STEM career opportunities within this State. Section 13-1-2220.    (A) There is created in the State Treasury the "South Carolina Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) Education Fund" (Fund). The fund is separate and distinct from the general fund of the State and all other funds. The fund shall consist of appropriations and donations, contributions, bequests, or other gifts. Earnings and interest on the fund must be credited to it and any balance in this fund at the end of the fiscal year carries forward in the fund in the succeeding fiscal year. (B) Monies in the fund must be expended solely to support the programs and priorities of the State in the advancement of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics for the purposes provided in this article. (C) The coalition may accept funds from other public entities and may accept private donations, contributions, bequests, or other gifts. Such monies not designated for specific purposes must be deposited into the fund. Grants or gifts designated for specific purposes within the coalition's scope of work may be managed by Clemson University or the Clemson University Foundation. Section 13-1-2230.    (A) There is created the "SC STEM Coalition Advisory Council" (advisory council) whose purpose is to: (1) approve all expenditures from the STEM Education Fund; (2) identify appropriate outcomes and measures of the coalition's impact; (3) ensure equitable, statewide application of coalition resources; (4) identify opportunities aligned with the mission of the coalition; and (5) promote activities of the coalition among peer organizations, both within and outside this State. (B)(1) The advisory council consists of eleven members consisting of: (a) the Executive Director of the Department of Employment and Workforce or his designee, who shall serve as chair of the advisory council; (b) the State Superintendent of Education or his designee, who shall serve conterminously with the appointing superintendent; (c) one STEM educator appointed by the State Superintendent of Education who shall serve conterminously with the appointing superintendent; (d) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives who shall serve a term of four years or until his successor is appointed and qualifies; (e) one member appointed by the President of the Senate who shall serve a term of four years or until his successor is appointed and qualifies; (f) two members appointed by the Governor to represent STEM-related business and industry in this State who shall serve terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualify; (g) one member appointed by the President of the Technical College System to represent the public technical colleges in this State, who shall serve a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualifies; (h) one member appointed by the President of the Commission on Higher Education to represent public higher education institutions in this State not otherwise represented pursuant to subitems (g),(i), or (j) of this subsection, who shall serve a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualifies; (i) one member appointed by the President of the University of South Carolina to represent the eight public institutions of the USC system, who shall serve a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualifies; and (j) one member appointed by the President of Clemson University to represent the university as the host site of the coalition, who shall serve a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualifies. (2) Initial appointments must be made before August 1, 2026, at which time the chair of the Department of Employment and Workforce Coordinating Council for Workforce Development or designee shall call the first meeting. (3) A member of the advisory council may not receive compensation for service but may receive the usual mileage, subsistence, and per diem as provided by law for members of state boards, committees, and commissions. Vacancies must be filled in the manner of original appointment and, in the case of members appointed pursuant to item (1)(e) and (f), for the unexpired portion of the term and until successors are appointed and qualify. Section 13-1-2240.    The coalition, subject to the availability of funds in the STEM Education Fund or other funds managed by Clemson University or the Clemson University Foundation for the specific purposes within the coalition's scope of work, shall: (1) be administered by a director approved by the advisory council and hired through Clemson University, which has historically supported the SCCMS and the S2TEM Centers; (2) provide a coordination point for STEM education programs in K-12 and higher education throughout South Carolina; (3) promote STEM education statewide in coordination with business and industry in support of the long-term economic prosperity of South Carolinians; (4) ensure the development of a South Carolina STEM workforce with better access to competitive employment opportunities and recognize the diverse pathways through which women and men may enter STEM fields including the consideration of nontraditional academic experiences, community-based learning, and career technical education; (5) collaborate with institutions of higher education to expand STEM opportunities in the State for high quality professional development for STEM educators with special emphasis on improving student learning outcomes in mathematics; (6) collaborate in the research and development of tools and best practices in STEM education with K-12 schools, institutions of higher education, state and federal agencies, business/industry partners, and other entities as appropriate; (7) facilitate participation in interscholastic, STEM-related competitions; (8) promote STEM teaching as a career opportunity; (9) annually identify and provide seed funding to school-based pilot STEM programs equitably distributed across the State; (10) annually advocate for an SC STEM Education Month and an SC STEM Education Day at the State Capitol and associated activities to promote STEM education; (11) annually promote and support a SC STEM Educator of the Year award and regional finalists for the award; (12) promote public awareness of STEM career opportunities through regional festivals and other community engagement strategies; (13) assist public school districts in developing and implementing a comprehensive merit-based plan to give all public school students equal access to STEM programs; (14) promote business and industry involvement in the actions and activities of the coalition; (15) develop and maintain a statewide database of STEM education assets; (16) perform gap analysis and assessments to identify industry and business needs and the resulting requirements for teacher professional development activities and initiatives; (17) support high quality professional learning focused on career readiness and talent development and provide other assistance for educators and students; (18) engage business and industry in support of STEM activities for schools to enhance career readiness; (19) develop and maintain statewide, regional, and national partnerships with not-for-profit, STEM missioned entities to promote STEM learning and career opportunities in underserved communities; (20) create STEM career development programs to include leadership training, mentorship programs, and work-life balance initiatives to encourage male and female students in STEM fields; (21) foster the development of all female and male students in an environment that minimizes bias and harassment and encourages the merit-based development of all women and men; and (22) annually before July first report appropriate outcomes and measures of the impact of the coalition to these entities: (a) the Office of the Governor through the Department of Employment and Workforce; (b) the State Superintendent of Education; (c) the General Assembly through the Senate Education Committee and the House Education and Public Works Committee; (d) the Education Oversight Committee; and (e) the advisory council. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________